Utah statutes.
38-1a-203.   Filings with the registry.

(1)  The division and the designated agent need not determine the timeliness of any notice before filing the notice in the registry.

(2)  A notice filed by a third party on behalf of another is considered to be filed by the person on whose behalf the notice is filed.

(3)  A person filing a notice of commencement, preliminary notice, or notice of completion is responsible for verifying the accuracy of information entered into the registry, whether the person files electronically, by alternate means, or through a third party.

(4)  Each notice or other document submitted for inclusion in the registry and for which this chapter does not specify information required to be included in the notice or other document shall contain:

(a)  the name of the county in which the project property to which the notice or other document applies is located;

(b)  for a private project:

(i)  the tax parcel identification number of each parcel included in the project property; or

(ii)  the number of the building permit for the construction project on the project property; and

(c)  for a government project, the government project-identifying information.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

